Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202646-730
Management area; action plan; district; duties.

Each district in which a management area has been designated or an action plan for a management area has been required pursuant to section 46-725 shall, in cooperation with the department, establish a program to monitor the quality of the ground water in the area and shall if appropriate provide each landowner or operator of an irrigation system with current information available with respect to fertilizer and chemical usage for the specific soil types present and cropping patterns used.

Laws 1986, LB 894, § 17;

Laws 1991, LB 51, § 16;

Laws 1993, LB 3, § 27;

R.S.1943, (1993), § 46-674.18;

Laws 1996, LB 108, § 50;

R.S.1943, (1998), § 46-656.44;

Laws 2004, LB 962, § 70;

Laws 2019, LB302, § 38;

Laws 2025, LB317, § 228.